Hawaii, session 2026, GM1141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 396-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by repealing the definitions of "hoisting machine" and
"hoisting machine operator".
[ " "Hoisting'maehin-e-^^-mcans a machine-with-a—hoist line/
—or hydrau-l-ic liftring mcoharbism used in Genstruction,
demolition,—or excavation work.
iftaehine—epere^feer^^^-^fteans—any—
epe-ratea—ar-heirafeiftg—maehine—ift—tlie—Statre-r-" ]
SECTION 2. Section 396-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Administration. The department shall be responsible
for administering occupational safety and health standards
throughout the State.
(1) The department shall prescribe and enforce rules under
chapter 91 as may be necessary for carrying out the
purposes and provisions of this chapter. The
department shall make reports to the United States
2026-2945 SB3144 HD2 HMSO
■■■■winnm

Page 2
S.B. NO.
^1
Secretary of Labor in the form and containing the
information that the Secretary from time to time shall
require pursuant to federal law;
(2) The department shall adopt, amend, or repeal
occupational safety and health standards in the manner
prescribed by rules adopted hereunder. Emergency
temporary standards may be adopted without conforming
to chapter 91 and without hearings to take immediate
effect upon giving a statewide public notice of the
emergency temporary standard or upon any other date
that may be specified in the notice. An emergency
temporary standard may be adopted if the director
determines:
(A) That employees are exposed to grave danger from
exposure to substances or agents determined to be
toxic or physically harmful or from new hazards;
and
(B) That the emergency temporary standard is
necessary to protect employees from danger.
The emergency temporary standard shall be effective
until superseded by a standard adopted in accordance
2026-2945 SB3144 HD2 HMSO 2

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
with the procedures set forth in chapter 91, but in
any case shall be effective no longer than six months;
(3) Variances from occupational safety and health
standards adopted under this chapter may be granted
upon application of an employer or employers.
Application for variances [must] shall correspond to
procedures set forth in the rules of this chapter.
The director may issue an order for variance if the
director determines that the proponent of the variance
has demonstrated that the conditions, practices,
means, methods, operations, or processes used or
proposed to be used by the employer will provide
employment and places of employment to the employer's
employees [whieh] that are as safe and healthful as
those [which] that would prevail if the employer
complied with the standard. The employer shall also
notify the employer's employees upon each application
for variance and the employees shall be given an
opportunity to request and participate in hearings or
other proceedings relating to applications for
variance. No inference of admission of violation of a
2026-2945 SB3144 HD2 HMSO 3

Page 4
S.B. NO. s'",
standard shall be made against the employer by reason
of the employer's application for variance; an^
(4) The department, upon the application of any employer
or other person affected thereby, may grant any time
that may reasonably be necessary for compliance with
any order. Any person affected by an order may
petition the department for an extension of time,
which may be granted if the department finds it
necessary [•;—antd
4^ The department shall -regulate hoisting ma-ehincs--and
shall cort-i-f-y their operators] ."
SECTION 3. Section 396-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows:
"(e ) Discharge or discrimination against employees for
exercising any right under this chapter is prohibited. In
consideration of this prohibition:
(1) No person shall discharge, suspend or otherwise
discriminate in terms and conditions of employment
against any employee by reason of:
(A) The employee's failure or refusal to operate or
handle any machine, device, apparatus, or
2026-2945 SB3144 HD2 HMSO 4

Page 5
S.B. NO. SS*i
equipment [wfeieh] that is in any unsafe
condition; or
(B) The employee's failure or refusal to engage in
unsafe practices in violation of this chapter or
of any standard, rule, regulation, citation^ or
order issued under the authority of this chapter;
(2) Upon discretion of the director or request, names of
complainants may be withheld from the employer;
(3) No person shall discharge or in any manner
discriminate against any employee because the employee
has filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be
instituted any proceeding under or related to this
chapter, or has testified or intends to testify in any
[•&u€h] proceeding, or acting to exercise or h^
exercised on behalf of the employee or others any
right afforded by this chapter;
(4) Any employee who believes that there has been a
discharge or discrimination against the employee by
any person in violation of this subsection may, within
sixty days after the violation occurs, file a
complaint with the director alleging unlawful
2026-2945 SB3144 HD2 HMSO 5

Page 6
S.B. NO.
discharge or discrimination and setting forth the
circumstances thereof;
Upon receipt of the complaint, the director shall
investigate to determine if a discharge or
discrimination in violation of this subsection has
occurred;
(6) If upon investigation the director determines that the
provisions of this subsection have been violated, the
director shall order the employer to provide all
appropriate relief to the employee, including rehiring
or reinstating the employee to the former position
with back pay and restoration of seniority;
Within ninety days of receipt of a complaint filed
under this subsection, [unless extended by the
director/] the director shall notify the employee of
the final determination and any subsequent action the
department will take to resolve the complaint
unless the investigation cannot be completed within
that period, in which case up to ninety additional
days shall be allowed without notice. Any further
extension may be granted by the director with notice
2026-2945 SB3144 HD2 HMSO 6

Page 7
S.B. NO.
to the employee of the additional time required and
the expected date of the final determination; and
(8) Nothing in this subsection shall preclude any employee
or representative of an employee from simultaneously
pursuing a cause of action for injunctive relief or
any other remedy provided by law."
SECTION 4. Section 396-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
[ "§396-19—Hoiating machine operators -advisory board-.-- ^a-h
Thorc io croatcd-a—hoisting machine opora-toro advioory board,
which shall be placed in- the department—for adminio-t-rati-ve
pa-rposcs/—to be composed- of five-members to serve without
Gempensation and-without—rcimbu-rsemont for expeaaos.—Members
ahaHr-^e—appeiftded—by-^the—gever^^ae—aader^-seetiafi—3-6—3-4-r
The board shall adopt rulc-s pursuant to ■ehaptcr 91 for the
Gortification of hoistiag machine operators.
-- The halst-ing machine operators advisory board--may
empiay-a—bime—agaivaiaat—af^iae—aaaiataabT—without
regard to chapters 7-6—and- 8-9—and may dismiss suab—person aa—It
fdada-a^aaaaaary—for the--porformanoc af—i-to function and- ■duties
2026-2945 SB3144 HD2 HMSO

Page 8
S.B. NO. S5*,
The board ahall—have the author-ity to fix the office aoolotant’o
eompenoat--ion. " ]
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2945 SB3144-HD2 HMSO 8
HIIHiMimillHHI

S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 26th day of May .2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No. 3144, S.D. 1,H.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 22, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 3144, SD 1,HD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
—
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives